Wyoming, session 2025, HB0316.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1.
(a) There is created the select committee on school
finance recalibration consisting of the following members:
(i) Six (6) members of the senate appointed by
the president to include one (1) member from the senate
minority political party;
(ii) Six (6) members of the house of
representatives appointed by the speaker to include one (1)
member from the house minority political party.
(b) The president of the senate and the speaker of
the house of representatives shall each select one (1)
co-chairman of the select committee. The legislative
service office shall staff the select committee.
(c) The select committee shall undertake a study to
recalibrate the education resource block grant model as
required by W.S. 21-13-309(t) to determine if modifications
are necessary to ensure the model remains cost-based in
light of changing conditions, including modifications to
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0316
ENROLLED ACT NO. 68, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
law and potential responses to court directives. The select
committee shall study virtual education funding models in
other states and offer suggestions on a funding formula for
Wyoming virtual schools that is both equitable and
predictable. The select committee may work with
professional consultant experts for model recalibration.
The legislative service office, subject to the approval of
management council, may retain professional consulting
experts for the purposes of this act.
(d) The select committee shall report its
recommendations and any associated legislation to the
legislature. The select committee may introduce legislation
as provided in W.S. 28-8-104(e).
(e) Appointments to the select committee shall be
made under this section not later than March 31, 2025. The
select committee shall remain in existence until February
9, 2026. Any vacancy occurring on the select committee
shall be filled without delay by the president of the
senate or the speaker of the house, as appropriate.
(f) The department of education, other state
agencies, school districts and the school data advisory
committee established under W.S. 21-2-203(d) shall collect
and provide information requested by the select committee
or professional consultant experts working with the select
committee.
Section 2. Nine hundred twenty thousand dollars
($920,000.00) is appropriated from the general fund to the
legislative service office to fund the model recalibration
study in accordance with section 1 of this act and for the
purposes of providing salary, including salary for the
chairmen under W.S. 28-5-101(e)(i), mileage and per diem to
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0316
ENROLLED ACT NO. 68, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
members of the select committee on school finance
recalibration and for other expenses of the select
committee authorized by law or policy of the legislature.
Funds appropriated under this section expended to conduct
the recalibration of the education resource block grant
model shall be in accordance with a contractual agreement
entered into between the management council and
professional consultants. This appropriation shall be for
the period beginning with the effective date of this act
and ending June 30, 2026. This appropriation shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose and any
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30,
2026.
Section 3.
(a) There is appropriated from the public school
foundation program account to the department of education-
school finance fifty-two million three hundred thousand
dollars ($52,300,000.00) for an external cost adjustment to
the education resource block grant model in accordance with
this section. If 2025 Senate File 0001 or 2025 House Bill
0001 is enacted into law, the appropriation in this
subsection shall be reduced by one dollar ($1.00) for every
one dollar ($1.00) appropriated to the department of
education-school finance for an external cost adjustment to
the education resource block grant model in 2025 Senate
File 0001 or 2025 House Bill 0001.
(b) In accordance with W.S. 21-13-309(o), the
appropriation in subsection (a) of this section provides
funding for an external cost adjustment to the education
resource block grant model, effective beginning with school
year 2025-2026, computed as follows:
3

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0316
ENROLLED ACT NO. 68, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(i) Eight and one-half percent (8.5%) for the
"professional labor" category of model components inclusive
of those components defined by 2012 Wyoming Session Laws,
Chapter 99, Section 3 [Attachment "A"(a)(vi)];
(ii) Eight and one-half percent (8.5%) for the
"nonprofessional labor" category of model components
inclusive of those components defined by 2012 Wyoming
Session Laws, Chapter 99, Section 3 [Attachment "A"(a)(v)];
(iii) One and sixty-seven thousandths percent
(1.067%) for the "educational materials" category of model
components inclusive of those components defined by 2012
Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 99, Section 3 [Attachment
"A"(a)(iii)];
(iv) Negative six and two hundred eighty-five
thousandths percent (-6.285%) for the "energy" category of
model components inclusive of those components defined by
2012 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 99, Section 3
[Attachment "A"(a)(iv)].
(c) The appropriation in subsection (a) of this
section shall be for the period beginning July 1, 2025 and
ending June 30, 2026. The appropriation in subsection (a)
of this section shall not be transferred or expended for
any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds
remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided
by law on June 30, 2026. It is the intent of the
legislature that the appropriation in subsection (a) of
this section be doubled and be included in the department
of education-school finance's standard budget for the
immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.
4

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0316
ENROLLED ACT NO. 68, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 4.
(a) There is appropriated from the public school
foundation program account to the department of education-
school finance sixty-nine million two hundred thousand
dollars ($69,200,000.00) for Wyoming school district
entitlement payments made in accordance with W.S.
21-13-313(c) and special education reimbursement payments
made in accordance with W.S. 21-13-321(b). This
appropriation shall be allocated by the department of
education-school finance for school district entitlement
payments, unit 4101, and special education payments, unit
4102, consistent with the requests from the state
superintendent of public instruction made to the joint
appropriations committee in letters dated December 6, 2024
and January 16, 2025.
(b) If 2025 Senate File 0001 or 2025 House Bill 0001
is enacted into law, the appropriation in subsection (a) of
this section shall be reduced by one dollar ($1.00) for
every one dollar ($1.00) appropriated to the department of
education-school finance for district entitlement payments
and special education payments in 2025 Senate File 0001 or
2025 House Bill 0001.
(c) The appropriation in this section shall be for
the period beginning July 1, 2025 and ending June 30, 2026.
This appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for
any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds
remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided
by law on June 30, 2026. It is the intent of the
legislature that the appropriation in this section be
doubled and included in the standard budget of the
department of education-school finance for the immediately
succeeding fiscal biennium.
5

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0316
ENROLLED ACT NO. 68, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 5.
(a) Subject to subsection (b) of this section, there
is appropriated from the public school foundation program
account to the department of education-school finance
eighty-four million four hundred thousand dollars
($84,400,000.00) for Wyoming school district entitlement
payments made in accordance with W.S. 21-13-313(c). This
appropriation shall be for the period beginning July 1,
2025 and ending June 30, 2026. This appropriation shall not
be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30,
2026.
(b) This section shall only be effective if 2025
Senate File 0069, 2025 Senate File 0153 or 2025 House Bill
0169 is enacted into law.
6

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0316
ENROLLED ACT NO. 68, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 6. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
7